Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 9. Conversions and Mergers.

§79-13-901.
Definitions.

In this article:

“Domestic partnership” means a partnership the internal affairs of which are governed by this chapter.

“Entity” means any association or legal entity organized to conduct business, including, without limitation, for profit and nonprofit corporations, limited partnerships, partnerships, limited liability partnerships, limited liability companies, joint ventures, joint stock companies, and business trusts.

“General partner” means a partner in a partnership and a general partner in a limited partnership.

“Limited partner” means a limited partner in a limited partnership.

“Limited partnership” means a limited partnership created under the Mississippi Limited Partnership Act (Section 79-14-101 et seq.), predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction.

“Partner” includes both a general partner and a limited partner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 901, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-902.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 48, effective January 1, 2015.

§79-13-902. [Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 902, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005]

Former
§ 79-13-902 provided for conversion of a partnership to a limited partnership.

Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, see §§ 79-14-101 et seq.

§79-13-903.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 49, effective January 1, 2015.

§79-13-903. [Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 903, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005]

Former
§ 79-13-903 was reserved for future enactment.

§79-13-904.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 50, effective January 1, 2015.

§79-13-904. [Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 903, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005]

Former
§ 79-13-904 provided for the effect of a conversion.

Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, see §§ 79-14-101 et seq.

§79-13-905.
Merger.

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, pursuant to a plan of merger approved as provided in subsection (d), one or more domestic partnerships may be merged with a domestic or foreign entity.

A domestic or foreign entity may be a party to the merger, or may be created by the terms of the plan of merger, only if:

The merger is permitted by the laws under which the entity is organized or by which it is governed; and

In effecting the merger, the entity complies with such laws and with its organizational documents.

If the surviving entity is a partnership or a limited partnership, the status of each partner;

The terms and conditions of the merger;

The manner and basis of converting the interests of each party to the merger into shares or other securities, interests, obligations, or rights to acquire shares or other securities of the surviving entity, or into money or other property, or any combination of the foregoing;

The organizational documents of any entity to be created by the merger, or if a new entity is not to be created by the merger, any amendments to the survivor’s organizational documents;

The street address of the surviving entity’s chief executive office; and

Any other provisions required by the laws under which any party to the merger is organized or by which it is governed, or by the organizational documents of any such party.

The plan of merger must set forth:

The name of each entity that is a party to the merger;

The name of the entity that will be the survivor of the merger;

The plan of merger must be approved:

In the case of a domestic partnership that is a party to the merger, by all of the partners, or a number or percentage specified for merger in the partnership agreement; and

In the case of a domestic limited liability partnership that is a party to a merger where the surviving entity is a partnership other than a limited liability partnership, by all of the partners, notwithstanding a provision to the contrary in the partnership agreement.

After a plan of merger is approved and before the merger takes effect, the plan may be amended or abandoned as provided in the plan.

The merger takes effect on the later of:

The approval of the plan of merger by all parties to the merger, as provided in subsection (d);

The filing of all documents required by law to be filed as a condition to the effectiveness of the merger; or

Any effective date specified in the plan of merger.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 905, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-906.
Effect of merger.

When a merger takes effect:

The separate existence of every domestic partnership that is a party to the merger, other than the surviving entity, ceases;

All property owned by each of the merged domestic partnerships vests in the surviving entity;

All obligations of every domestic partnership that is a party to the merger become the obligations of the surviving entity; and

An action or proceeding pending against a domestic partnership that is a party to the merger may be continued as if the merger had not occurred, or the surviving entity may be substituted as a party to the action or proceeding.

The Secretary of State of this state is the agent for service of process in an action or proceeding against a surviving foreign entity to enforce an obligation of a domestic partnership that is a party to a merger. The surviving foreign entity shall promptly notify the Secretary of State of the mailing address of its chief executive office and of any change of address. Upon receipt of process, the Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the process to the surviving foreign entity.

A partner of a domestic partnership which is a party to a merger remains liable for all obligations incurred by such domestic partnership before the merger and for which the partner was personally liable before the merger.

Without affecting any liability a partner may have in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, a partner of a domestic partnership which is the survivor of a merger:

Shall not become personally liable as a result of the merger for obligations of the surviving partnership incurred before the merger by a party to the merger of which that partner was not a general partner; and

Except as otherwise provided in Section 79-13-306, shall become personally liable for all obligations of the surviving partnership incurred after the merger takes effect.

In the case of a partner of a domestic partnership which is a party to a merger who does not become a partner, shareholder, member or other equity owner of the surviving entity:

The surviving entity shall cause the partner’s interest in the partnership to be purchased under Section 79-13-701; and

If the surviving entity is a domestic partnership, the surviving partnership is bound under Section 79-13-702 by an act of the terminated partner, and the terminated partner is liable under Section 79-13-703 for transactions entered into by the surviving partnership after the merger takes effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 906, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-907.
Statement of merger.

After a merger, the surviving domestic or foreign entity may file a statement that one or more domestic partnerships have merged into the surviving entity.

A statement of merger must contain:

The name of each entity that is a party to the merger;

The name and domicile of the entity that will be the survivor of the merger;

The street address of the surviving entity’s chief executive office and of an office in this state, if any; and

The type of entity of the surviving entity is (e.g., partnership, limited partnership, for profit corporation, etc.).

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), for the purposes of Section 79-13-302, property of the surviving entity which before the merger was held in the name of another party to the merger is property held in the name of the surviving entity upon filing a statement of merger.

For the purposes of Section 79-13-302, real property of the surviving entity which before the merger was held in the name of another party to the merger is property held in the name of the surviving entity upon recording a certified copy of the statement of merger in the office for recording transfers of that real property.

A filed and, if appropriate, recorded statement of merger, executed and declared to be accurate pursuant to Section 79-13-105(c), stating the name of a partnership that is a party to the merger in whose name property was held before the merger and the name of the surviving entity, but not containing all of the other information required by subsection (b), operates with respect to the partnerships named to the extent provided in subsections (c) and (d).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 907, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

Execution, filing and recording of statements, see § 79-13-105.

Filing fees, see § 79-13-105.

§79-13-908.
Nonexclusive.

This article is not exclusive.Partnerships may be converted or merged in any other manner provided or permitted by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 908; Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 40, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, inserted “or permitted” in the last sentence.